Tennessee, session 114, SB2452.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 57-4-101(o), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting:
(o) It is lawful to furnish, dispense, or give away alcoholic beverages and beer
without a license or permit issued by the commission at a private party or private event;
provided, that a person at such party or event shall not furnish, dispense, or give away
alcoholic beverages or beer to a person who is not twenty-one (21) years of age or
older.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 57-4-101(g)(2), is amended by
adding the following language at the end of the subdivision:
The owner or operator of the event shall submit with the request for approval for
the event proof satisfactory that the owner or operator has taken reasonable
steps to ensure that alcoholic beverages are not served to persons who are not
twenty-one (21) years of age or older in attendance at the event.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2452
012748
- 1 -